Idaho, session 2025, H0223.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5291, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5291. LEGISLATIVE REVIEW OF RULES. (1) A standing committee of the
legislature shall review any temporary, pending, or final rule that is ger-
mane to its committee and has been published in the bulletin or in the admin-
istrative code to determine if the rule is consistent with the legislative
intent of the statute that the rule was written to interpret, prescribe, im-
plement, or enforce. If a reviewed rule is approved, the standing committee
that approves the rule shall report its findings and recommendations to the
body. If ordered by the presiding officer, the committee's report shall be
printed in the journal.
(2)(a) All temporary, and pending, and final rules of any nature may be
approved or rejected by a concurrent resolution of the legislature. The
concurrent resolution shall state the effective date of the approval or
rejection.
(b) The legislature may reject a final rule, in whole or in part, by con-
current resolution where the legislature determines that the rule, or
part of the rule, is not consistent with the legislative intent of the
statute that the rule was written to interpret, prescribe, implement,
or enforce. When rejecting a rule, the legislature shall make a finding
of facts as to why the rule does not meet the legislative intent of the
enabling statute by identifying how the rule is inconsistent with the
authority granted by or the requirements of the corresponding section
of Idaho Code. For purposes of this section, "part of the rule" means a
provision in a rule that is designated either numerically or alphabeti-
cally or the entirety of any new or amended language contained therein.
The rejection of a rule in whole or in part shall terminate the rule, in
whole or in part, as of the effective date of the rejection June 30 of the
year in which it was rejected, unless otherwise stated in the concurrent
resolution. An agency shall not, subsequent to the rejection, issue a
proposed rule that is substantially similar to the rejected rule unless
it is consistent with the legislative intent of the statute as expressed
in the concurrent resolution.
(c) The secretary of state shall immediately notify the affected agency
of the filing and effective date of any concurrent resolution enacted to
approve or reject, in whole or in part, an agency rule. When an agency


rule has been partially rejected, the secretary of state shall trans-
mit a copy of the concurrent resolution to the director of the agency for
promulgation of the rule as amended.
(d) The agency shall be responsible for implementing legislative in-
tent as expressed in the concurrent resolution, including, as appropri-
ate, the reinstatement of the prior rule in whole or in part, if any, in
the case of a resolution rejecting a rule in whole or in part. The agency
shall publish notice of rejection of a rule in whole or in part in the
bulletin.
(3) A temporary rule that is not approved by a concurrent resolution
shall expire by its own terms or at adjournment sine die of the next succeed-
ing regular session of the legislature on June 30 of the year following its
adoption, whichever date is earlier, unless otherwise stated in a concurrent
resolution.
(4) Except as set forth in sections 67-5226 and 67-5228, Idaho Code, a
pending fee rule that is not approved by a concurrent resolution shall expire
upon adjournment sine die of the legislative session during which the agency
submits the pending fee rule to the legislature for review, unless otherwise
stated in the concurrent resolution.
(5) Except as set forth in sections 67-5226 and 67-5228, Idaho Code, a
pending non-fee rule that is not approved by a concurrent resolution shall
expire upon adjournment sine die of the legislative session during which the
agency submits the pending rule to the legislature for review, unless other-
wise stated in the concurrent resolution.
(6) On and after January 1, 2024, pending Pending fee and non-fee rules
shall become effective on July 1 in the year of the legislative session in
which the rule was approved by concurrent resolution unless otherwise speci-
fied in the concurrent resolution.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.